test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v3piera_piera_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    app: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pierä - ei tsekattu : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     pierä+V+Inf: pierä
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pieren
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pieret
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pieree
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pieremä
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pierettä
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pierhään
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pierin
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pierit
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pieri
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pierimä
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pierittä
     pierä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pierthiin
     pierä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pierry
     pierä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pierty
     pierä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pierheet
     pierä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pierreevä
     pierä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pierreevät
     pierä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: piertävä
     pierä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: piertävät

     pierä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: pierisin
     pierä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: pierisit
     pierä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: pieris
     pierä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: pierisimmä
     pierä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: pierisittä
     pierä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: piertäis
     pierä+V+Pass+Cond: piertäis

     pierä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: piere
     pierä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: pierkkää
     
     pierä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: pieremässä
     pierä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: pieremästä
     pierä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: pieremhään
     pierä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: pieremällä
     pierä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: pieremättä
